Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1330
Act, how cited.

Sections 66-1330 to 66-1351 shall be known and may be cited as the Ethanol Development Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 279, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 587, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 754, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 66-1301;

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 377, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 536, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 479, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB507, § 7.